Illinois, session 104th, SB3473.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5e.1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5e.1)7    Sec. 5-5e.1. Safety-Net Hospitals.8    (a) A Safety-Net Hospital is an Illinois hospital that:9        (1) is licensed by the Department of Public Health as 10    a general acute care or pediatric hospital; and11        (2) is a disproportionate share hospital, as described 12    in Section 1923 of the federal Social Security Act, as 13    determined by the Department; and14        (3) meets one of the following:15            (A) has a MIUR of at least 40% and a charity 16        percent of at least 4%; or17            (B) has a MIUR of at least 50%.18    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:19        (1) "Charity percent" means the ratio of (i) the 20    hospital's charity charges for services provided to 21    individuals without health insurance or another source of 22    third party coverage to (ii) the Illinois total hospital 23    charges, each as reported on the hospital's OBRA form.  SB3473- 2 -LRB104 18584 KTG 32027 b1        (2) "MIUR" means Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate 2    and is defined as a fraction, the numerator of which is the 3    number of a hospital's inpatient days provided in the 4    hospital's fiscal year ending 3 years prior to the rate 5    year, to patients who, for such days, were eligible for 6    Medicaid under Title XIX of the federal Social Security 7    Act, 42 USC 1396a et seq., excluding those persons 8    eligible for medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 9    1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) as set forth in paragraph 18 of 10    Section 5-2 of this Article, and the denominator of which 11    is the total number of the hospital's inpatient days in 12    that same period, excluding those persons eligible for 13    medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 14    1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) as set forth in paragraph 18 of 15    Section 5-2 of this Article.16        (3) "OBRA form" means form HFS-3834, OBRA '93 data 17    collection form, for the rate year.18        (4) "Rate year" means the 12-month period beginning on 19    October 1.20    (c) Beginning July 1, 2012 and ending on December 31, 2028 212026, a hospital that would have qualified for the rate year 22beginning October 1, 2011 or October 1, 2012 shall be a 23Safety-Net Hospital.24    (c-5) Beginning July 1, 2020 and ending on December 31, 252026, a hospital that would have qualified for the rate year 26beginning October 1, 2020 and was designated a federal rural   SB3473- 3 -LRB104 18584 KTG 32027 b1referral center under 42 CFR 412.96 as of October 1, 2020 shall 2be a Safety-Net Hospital. 3    (d) No later than August 15 preceding the rate year, each 4hospital shall submit the OBRA form to the Department. Prior 5to October 1, the Department shall notify each hospital 6whether it has qualified as a Safety-Net Hospital.7    (e) The Department may promulgate rules in order to 8implement this Section.9    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as limiting 10the ability of the Department to include the Safety-Net 11Hospitals in the hospital rate reform mandated by Section 1214-11 of this Code and implemented under Section 14-12 of this 13Code and by administrative rulemaking. 14(Source: P.A. 101-650, eff. 7-7-20; 101-669, eff. 4-2-21; 15102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.